South Dakota, session 2026, SB174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $5,000,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Education, for the purpose of defraying the operational costs of school districts.
Section 2. The Department of Education shall grant the moneys appropriated in section 1 of
this Act directly to school districts. Each district must be granted a pro rata share of the
moneys appropriated in section 1 of this Act, based on the district's 2026 fall enrollment in
relation to the statewide 2026 fall enrollment, as determined under subdivision 13-13-
10.1(2).
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Education shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by June
30, 2027, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.